District of Columbia statutes.
43-108

Election of officers.

The first election of officers by the persons associating, according to and for the purpose specified in § 43-101, shall be at the time and place designated and agreed upon by a majority of the persons so associating themselves together, and no other than such persons shall vote at such election.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1295, ch. 854, § 664
1981 Ed., § 27-108.
1973 Ed., § 27-108.